Hawaii statutes.
§321C-6 Office of language access;
established. There is established within the department of health, for
administrative purposes only, the office of language access. The head of the
office shall be known as the executive director of the office of language
access. The executive director shall be appointed by the governor without
regard to chapter 76. The executive director shall:

(1) Provide oversight, central coordination, and
technical assistance to state agencies in their implementation of language
access requirements under this chapter or under any other law, regulation, or
guidance;

(2) Provide technical assistance to covered entities
in their implementation of this chapter;

(3) Review and monitor each state agency's language
access plan for compliance with this chapter;

(4) Where reasonable access is not provided, endeavor
to eliminate the language access barrier using informal methods, including
conference, conciliation, mediation, or persuasion. Where the language access
barrier cannot be eliminated by informal methods, the executive director shall
submit a written report with the executive director's opinion and
recommendation to the state agency or the covered entity. The executive
director may request the state agency or the covered entity to notify the
executive director, within a specified time, of any action taken on the
executive director's recommendation;

(5) Consult with language access coordinators, the
language access advisory council, and state department directors or their equivalent;

(6) Subject to section 321C-3, create, distribute to
the State, and make available to covered entities, multilingual signage in the
more frequently encountered languages in the State, and other languages as
needed, informing individuals of their right to free oral language services and
inviting them to identify themselves as persons needing services;

(7) Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to address the
language needs of limited English proficient persons;

(8) Administer a statewide language access resource
center that shall:

(A) Maintain a publicly available roster of
language interpreters and translators, listing their qualifications and
credentials based upon guidelines established by the office of language access
in consultation with the language access advisory council;

(B) Train state and state-funded agencies on
how to effectively obtain and utilize the services of language interpreters and
translators;

(C) Support the recruitment and retention of
language interpreters and translators providing services to state and
state-funded agencies;

(D) Provide, coordinate, and publicize
training opportunities to increase the number and availability of qualified
language interpreters and translators and further develop their language
interpretation and translation skills; and

(E) Work toward identifying or creating a
process to test and certify language interpreters and translators and promote
use of the process to ensure the quality and accuracy of the language
interpretation and translation services; and

(9) Have the authority to hire personnel necessary to
staff the statewide language access resource center and to administer its
multilingual website. The staff, at a minimum, shall consist of one full-time
project coordinator, three full-time program specialists, and one full-time
clerk. To the extent possible, the executive director shall hire bilingual
personnel to staff the statewide language access resource center and to
administer its website. [L 2012, c 201, pt of §2; am L 2013, c 217, §3, pt of §4]

Note

Multilingual website pilot project (ends June 30, 2017);
report to 2017 legislature. L 2013, c 217, §2.

Revision Note

L 2013, c 217, pt of §4 was codified to this section as
paragraph (9) pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next